Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1781XS (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. 57 Section 1. Section 229A.5C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. Upon the filing of a complaint, indictment, or 3 information, the person shall be transferred to the county 4 jail in the county where the public offense occurred until the 5 criminal proceedings have been completed. 6 b. If the person is sentenced to a term of confinement 7 in a county jail, the person shall serve the sentence at the 8 county jail. If the person is sentenced to the custody of the 9 director of the department of corrections, the person shall 10 serve the sentence at a correctional institution. 11 c. (1) If a person who is subject to an order of civil 12 commitment under this chapter is transferred to a county jail 13 or sentenced to a term of confinement in a county jail pursuant 14 to this subsection, the department shall reimburse the county 15 at a rate of fifty dollars per day for the time period the 16 person is temporarily held after transfer or is confined in the 17 county jail. 18 (2) The department shall use funds appropriated to the 19 department for costs associated with the treatment and 20 commitment of sexually violent predators in the unit located 21 at the state mental health institute at Cherokee, or use funds 22 transferred pursuant to section 218.6, for the payment of 23 reimbursements pursuant to subparagraph (1). 24